Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-229
Solicitor, sponsor, or seller; prohibited acts.

A solicitor, sponsor, or seller shall not:

(1) Misrepresent the source of any written prize notice;

(2) Represent directly or by implication that the number of individuals eligible for the prize is limited or that an individual has won or will receive a particular prize unless that representation is true;

(3) Misrepresent the value of a prize; or

(4) Request or accept any payment, or create an impression that any payment is required, from an individual prior to the receipt of a written prize notice by such individual if the solicitor, sponsor, or seller represents to such individual that he or she has won or will receive a prize. A written prize notice under this subdivision shall contain all the information required in section 86-228.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 165, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2008;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 91.